North Carolina, session 2025, HB779.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Chapter 103 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
section to read:
"§ 103-19. Day of the child.
The first Sunday of June of each year is designated as Children's Day in North Carolina."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H779-v-1*